California statutes. Education Code
(a) (1) (A) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the sum of six hundred fifty million dollars ($650,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges for transfer to the Learning Recovery Emergency Fund created in Section 32525. The chancellor’s office shall allocate available moneys in the Learning
 Recovery Emergency Fund deposited pursuant to this section to community college districts in the manner, and for the purposes, set forth in this section. This allocation shall be known as the California Community College COVID-19 Recovery Block Grant.

(B) The Legislature finds and declares that, on March 4, 2020, the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(2) The chancellor’s office shall allocate the funds described in paragraph (1) to community college districts on the basis of actual reported full-time equivalent students, as those numbers of students are reported at the time of the second principal apportionment for the 2021–22
 fiscal year.

(3) The funds appropriated in this section may be expended for any of the following purposes:

(A) Supports to address other barriers to learning as a result of disruption caused by COVID-19, such as access to basic needs and mental health services needed to support students impacted by COVID-19.

(B) Reengagement strategies for students who received an incomplete or failing grade in the spring 2022 term due to COVID-19 and engagement strategies with high schools and local communities to restore broader access.

(C) Grants to faculty to develop online, accelerated learning modules that allow students who received an incomplete or failing grade in the spring 2022 term due to COVID-19 to continue to make progress toward their degree rather than
 retaking courses in the fall 2022 term.

(D) Professional development opportunities for faculty and student services professionals needed to continue educational instruction due to COVID-19, including supporting students impacted by learning loss related to COVID-19 and preparing and supporting faculty to develop online instructional capabilities in response to COVID-19.

(E) Investments to close the digital divide, including investments in information technology infrastructure, facilitating student access to technology to be able to access online coursework, and technology, software, or other electronic instruments and materials for faculty to support courses that are difficult to teach online.

(F) Cleaning supplies and personal protective equipment.

(G) To discharge unpaid fees due or owed by a student to a community college in the district.

(H) The purposes and activities identified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 55 of Chapter 54 of the Statutes of 2022 and subdivision (a) of Provision 2 of Item 6870-121-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(4) As a condition of receiving funds provided in paragraph (1), community college districts shall perform both of the following:

(A) Report,
 on or before March 1, 2023, to the chancellor’s office metrics on the provision of employer-sponsored health insurance for part-time faculty in the 2021–22 academic year, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) If the community college district offers health insurance to its part-time faculty, and if so, the minimum conditions for obtaining employer-sponsored coverage.

(ii) The total number of qualifying part-time faculty and the number of participants in the Part-Time Community College Faculty Health
 Insurance program pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 87860) of Chapter 3 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3.

(iii) The total number of part-time faculty who do not qualify for the Part-Time Community College Faculty Health Insurance program pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 87860) of Chapter 3 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3, but whose total cumulative teaching assignments at two or more community college districts equals or exceeds 40 percent of the cumulative equivalent of a minimum full-time teaching assignment.

(iv) The source of health insurance by the number of part-time faculty in each category or type, which may include, but is not limited to, a community college district, a pooled health benefit plan, a spouse or domestic partner’s employer, another employer, private insurance, Covered California, Medi-Cal, or no health insurance.

(B) Report,
 on or before March 1, 2026, metrics on the provision of employer-sponsored health insurance to part-time faculty in the 2024–25 academic year, including, but not limited to, the metrics referenced in subparagraph (A).

(5) The chancellor’s office shall submit a report, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the use of funds
 on or before March 1, 2024, to the Legislature, Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance that includes the amount of funds provided for each community college, a description of how funds were used for each of the purposes reflected in paragraph (3), a statement of reasons describing how the funds prioritized services for underrepresented students, and an explanation of the effectiveness of services or supports provided by these funds.

(6) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds shall be used on activities that directly support community college students and mitigate community college student learning loss related to COVID-19
 impacts, and that community college districts prioritize the use of these one-time funds for purposes, including, but not limited to, professional development, technology infrastructure, developing open education resources and zero-textbook-cost degrees, and supporting the mental health and wellness needs of students and staff.

(b) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues
 appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 2.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

TITLE 2. ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION [33000. - 65001.]



DIVISION 2. STATE ADMINISTRATION [33000. - 33804.]



  PART 20. STATE EDUCATIONAL AGENCIES [33000. - 33804.]



  CHAPTER 1. State Board of Education [33000. - 33053.]



  ARTICLE 1. Composition [33000. - 33011.]

33000.

There is in the state government a State Board of Education, consisting of 10 members, who are appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of two-thirds of the Senate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33000.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 33000 and 33001, the Governor shall also appoint a student member to the state board with the advice and consent of two-thirds of the Senate. 

(b) The term of office of the student member is one year, and shall begin on August 1. An individual may serve only one term as a student member.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 1020 of the Government Code, the student member shall be, at the time the student member’s one-year term commences, a student enrolled in good standing in grade 12 in a public high school. The student member shall be selected from three students recommended by the state board pursuant to subdivision (d). The student
 member shall be a voting member with the full rights and duties of the other 10 members of the state board.

(d) The process for selecting the student member shall be as follows:

(1) Each year, the state board shall notify every school district that applications are being accepted for the student member’s position.

(2) A screening committee of the state board shall select 12 semifinalists for the student member’s position. Those semifinalists shall be presented to the California Association of Student Councils, which shall select a maximum of six final candidates for presentation to the state board.

(3) Each year, the state board shall select three finalists for the Governor’s consideration and may rank the finalists according to its
 preference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 5.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33001.

The term of office of the members of the board is four years, and they shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successors. The terms of the members of the board in office when this section takes effect shall expire as follows:

Three members January 15, 1960.

Two members January 15, 1961.

Three members January 15, 1962.

Two members January 15, 1963.

The terms shall expire in the same relative order as to each member as the term for which he holds office before this section takes effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.

Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the Governor, subject to confirmation by two-thirds of the Senate. The appointee to fill a vacancy shall hold office only for the balance of the unexpired term.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33003.

The board, through its own bylaws, shall provide for its operation and organization, including, but not limited to, the election of its officers and the establishment of its committees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

33004.

The Superintendent shall be secretary and shall act as executive officer of the state board. The Superintendent shall have charge of all its correspondence and shall keep a record of its proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 21.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

33005.

The board shall appoint an acting secretary, who shall also act as executive officer of the board in the absence of the Superintendent of Public Instruction from the state, or in case of his incapacity for duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33006.

(a) Members of the board shall receive their actual and necessary traveling expenses while on official business. Each member shall also receive the allowance in excess of expenses specified in Section 11564.5 of the Government Code for each day he or she is acting in an official capacity.

(b) Effective January 1, 1997, when a board member is employed by a public school and, while the board member is acting in his or her official capacity as a member of the board, and his or her employer is required to hire a substitute teacher to replace that board member, then the board may, from funds appropriated for support of the board’s activities, reimburse that public school for the daily cost of hiring the substitute teacher during the board member’s absence from his or her employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 825, Sec. 7.   Effective October 9, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

33007.

The board shall meet at least six times a year at such times as it may by resolution determine; provided, that it shall meet at least once every three months.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33008.

Special meetings may be called by the president. Upon the request of any four members in writing, the secretary shall call a special meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33009.

Notice of each meeting shall be given by the secretary by registered mail to each member of the board at least 10 days prior to the time of the meeting. Notice of the meeting may be waived in writing by all members of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33009.5.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 11125 of the Government Code, when the board provides information on its Internet site, that is available to subscribers to the extent permitted by law, concerning an agenda item, it shall provide the same information that is otherwise provided to board members. Nothing in this section is intended to require the board to provide any additional printed or electronic information beyond that which it would otherwise make available to the public at the open session.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1020, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

33009.7.

(a) The state board shall provide for live video and audio transmission of all board meetings and hearings that are open to the public through a technology that is accessible to as large a segment of the public as possible, including, but not limited to, the use of any of the following technologies:

(1) Cable, satellite, over-the-air, or any other type of transmission that can be accessed through a television.

(2) Web cast.

(b) The state board shall ensure that any Web cast transmission implemented pursuant to subdivision (a) may be transmitted over and accessed through the K-12 High-Speed Network established
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11800.

(c) The state board shall consult with the State Chief Information Officer for the purposes of implementing this section pursuant to the duties that the State Chief Information Officer is required to perform, as described in Section 11545 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   (SB 312)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33010.

The concurrence of six members of the board shall be necessary to the validity of any of its acts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33011.

Whenever by any law the board is authorized to appoint members to a board, commission, or other statutorily created body, the board may also appoint a nonvoting student member to that body. The student member shall receive actual and necessary expenses from the body to which he or she is appointed and shall be afforded an opportunity to express his or her preference on all matters voted upon by that body. The term of office of all student members appointed pursuant to this section shall be one year beginning on August 1. A person may serve only one term as a student member. The board shall determine the process for selecting student members appointed pursuant to this section by amendment to its bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1461, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [33030. - 33043.]

33030.

The board shall determine all questions of policy within its powers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33031.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state (a) for its own government, (b) for the government of its appointees and employees, (c) for the government of the day and evening elementary schools, the day and evening secondary schools, and the technical and vocational schools of the state, and (d) for the government of other schools, excepting the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges, as may receive in whole or in part financial support from the state.

The rules and regulations adopted shall be published for distribution as soon as practicable after adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 185.)
-------------------------------------------

33032.

The board shall study the educational conditions and needs of the state. It shall make plans for the improvement of the administration and efficiency of the public schools of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33033.

The State Board of Education may:

(a) Establish at the request of the governing authorities of any state institution, courses of instruction for the inmates of the institution.

(b) Examine under arrangements with the governing authorities of the institution the progress of students taking the courses and grant high school diplomas to students meeting the requirements for high school graduation. Certificates of completion previously awarded by the State Board of Education to students who, at the time of the award of a certificate of completion, met the requirements for high school graduation, shall be deemed for all purposes to be the equivalent of diplomas of high school graduation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 556, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

33034.

The board shall issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses before the board, or any member thereof, in the same manner as any court in this state. Whenever the testimony of any witness upon any matter pending before it is material, the president shall cause the attendance of the witnesses before the board, or a member of the board, to testify concerning the matter, and the board may make a reasonable allowance for this purpose not exceeding the fees of witnesses in civil cases. The allowance shall be paid for out of the appropriation for the expense of the board, but in no instance shall an allowance be made in favor of a witness who appears in behalf of a claimant. The provisions of this section shall not apply to proceedings conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33035.

The board shall adopt and use an official seal in authentication of its acts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33036.

The board shall cause the Department of General Services to do any printing required by it. All orders for printing shall first be approved by the Department of General Services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33037.

The board shall submit to the Governor biennially on or before the fifteenth day of September next preceding the regular session of the Legislature, a report of its transactions for the preceding two years, together with recommendations of its needs for the coming biennium, and such recommendations as to changes in laws or new educational legislation as may seem to it to be necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33039.

The State Board of Education shall develop guidelines which school districts may use in the development of teacher evaluation procedures pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 1 of Part 25 of Division 3 of this title, and shall distribute such guidelines to every school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33040.

The State Board of Education and the governing bodies of any county, city, and fire protection district are authorized to enter into agreements providing for the assignment of employees of the fire departments of such counties, cities, and fire protection districts to serve as instructors in fire training programs conducted under the auspices of the State Board of Education and providing for the payment to such counties, cities, and fire protection districts by the State Board of Education from the funds appropriated for vocational education of such amount as may be agreed upon for the services of such employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33041.

The State Board of Education shall revise the health instruction framework adopted by the board in 1977 to include instructional guidelines on the following:

(a) The relationship of proper health and nutritional practices during pregnancy to the health of the newborn child for pupils that are 12 to 18 years of age.

(b) The recognition that violence is a public health issue and a condition that is learned and may be prevented through education and community-based intervention. In helping to carry out this requirement, the State Department of Education shall consult with existing community resources that have expertise in these matters when developing a curriculum for violence as a public health issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1065, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33042.

The Legislature encourages school districts to comply with the State Board of Education’s English Language and Arts Writing Arts Strategies on cursive handwriting standards whereby pupils are expected to write fluidly and legibly. School districts are encouraged to teach methods of penmanship that may include, but are not limited to, the D’Nealian Method and the Palmer Method of penmanship.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 508, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

33043.

(a) The Governor may appoint a total of six deputies to the executive director of the state board. A deputy to the executive director appointed pursuant to this section shall be exempt from state civil service pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that appointments to these exempt positions do not result in an increase in the amount appropriated to the state board in the annual Budget Act or a net increase in the expenditures of the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 11.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Waiver Authority [33050. - 33053.]

33050.

(a) The governing board of a school district or a county board of education, on a districtwide or countywide basis or on behalf of one or more of its schools or programs, after a public hearing on the matter, may request the state board to waive all or part of any section of this code or any regulation adopted by the state board that implements a provision of this code that may be waived, except:

(1) Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 2574) of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(2) Article 1 (commencing with Section 15700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 15780) of Chapter 4 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(3) Chapter 6
 (commencing with Section 16000) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(4) Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000), Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), and Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(5) Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000), Part 13.5 (commencing with Section 25900), and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) of Division 1 of Title 1.

(6) Section 35735.1.

(7) Paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 37220.

(8) The following provisions of Part 10.5 (commencing with Section 17210) of Division 1 of Title 1:

(A) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section
 17210).

(B) Article 1 (commencing with Section 17251) to Article 7 (commencing with Section
 17375), inclusive, of Chapter 3.

(C) Sections 17416 to 17429, inclusive; Sections 17459 and 17462; subdivision (a) of Section 17464; and Sections 17582 to 17590, inclusive.

(9) The following provisions of Part 24 (commencing with Section 41000) of Division 3:

(A) Sections 41000 to 41360, inclusive.

(B) Sections 41420 to 41423, inclusive.

(C) Section 41544.

(D) Sections 41600 to 41863, inclusive.

(E) Sections 41930 to 42850, inclusive.

(10) Sections 44504
 and 44505.

(11) Article 3 (commencing with Section 44930) of Chapter 4 of Part 25 of Division 3 and regulations in Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations adopted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 44930) of Chapter 4 of Part 25 of Division 3.

(12) Part 26 (commencing with Section 46000) of Division 4.

(13) The following provisions of Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600) of Division 4:

(A) Subdivision (i) of Section 47632.

(B) Section 47635.

(C) Section 47652.

(D) Article 6 (commencing with Section 47660) of Chapter 6.

(14) Article 1 (commencing with Section 48000) of Chapter 1 of Part 27 of Division 4.

(15) Section 48310.

(16) Section 48359.5.

(17) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 48900) and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 49060) of Part 27 of Division 4.

(18) Section 51513.

(19) Section 52163.

(20) The identification and assessment criteria relating to any categorical aid program, including Sections 52164.1 and 52164.6.

(21) Sections 52165, 52166, and 52178.

(22) Section 56364.1, except that this restriction shall not prohibit the state board from approving any waiver of Section 56364.2, relating to full inclusion.

(23) Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 of Division 4, relating to the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress (CAASPP), and any other provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 60600) of Part 33 of Division 4 that establish requirements for the CAASPP.

(24) Part 38 (commencing with Section 65000) of Division 4.

(b) A request for a waiver submitted by the governing board of a school district or a county board of education pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include a written statement as to both of the following:

(1) Whether the exclusive representative of employees, if any, as provided in Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, participated in the development of the waiver.

(2) The exclusive representative’s position regarding the waiver.

(c) A request for a waiver submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) relating to a regional occupational center or program established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 52300) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4, which is operated by a joint powers entity established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, shall be submitted as a joint waiver request for each participating school district and shall meet both of the following conditions:

(1) Each joint waiver request shall comply with all of the requirements of this article.

(2) The submission of a joint waiver request shall be approved by a unanimous vote of the governing board of the joint powers agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 38.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

33051.

(a) The state board shall approve any and all requests for waivers except in those cases where the board specifically finds any of the following:

(1) The educational needs of the pupils are not adequately addressed.

(2) The waiver affects a program that requires the existence of a schoolsite council and the schoolsite council did not approve the request.

(3) The appropriate councils or advisory committees, including bilingual advisory committees, did not have an adequate opportunity to review the request and the request did not include a written summary of any objections to the request by the councils or advisory committees.

(4) Pupil or school personnel protections are jeopardized.

(5) Guarantees of parental involvement are jeopardized.

(6) The request would substantially increase state costs.

(7) The exclusive representative of employees, if any, as provided in Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, was not a participant in the development of the waiver.

(b) The governing board of a school district that has requested and received a general waiver under this article for two consecutive years for the same general waiver is not required to reapply annually if the information contained on the request remains current. The state board may require updated information for the request whenever it determines that information to be necessary. This section does not prevent the state board from rescinding a waiver if additional information supporting a rescission is made available to the board. This waiver process shall not apply to waivers pertaining to teacher credentialing, which shall be submitted to the state board annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

33051.5.

Not less than 30 days prior to any public hearing it conducts pursuant to Section 33050 concerning a request to waive any provision of Article 5 (commencing with Section 39390) of Chapter 3 of Part 23, the State Board of Education shall provide written notice of the hearing to each public agency to which an offer of sale or lease must be made under Section 39394.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 837, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

33052.

(a) If formal action by the State Board of Education on a waiver request is not taken by the second regular meeting of the board following receipt of a complete and documented waiver request by the State Department of Education, the waiver shall be deemed approved for one year, commencing the first day of the following month.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no provision of Article 5 (commencing with Section 39390) of Chapter 3 of Part 23 shall be waived except by formal action of the State Board of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1461, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

33052.3.

For the purposes of improving the financial management and reporting practices of school districts and county offices of education, and developing and testing those practices prior to implementation, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may waive for up to three consecutive fiscal years the requirements of current law and the regulations that are in conflict with the proposed improvements. A waiver shall only be available to school districts and county offices of education that volunteer to develop and test the proposed improved financial management and reporting practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1461, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

33052.5.

For purposes of this article, “school district” shall include county offices of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1302, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

33053.

The State Department of Education shall annually submit a report to the Governor, Legislature, State Board of Education, and make the report available to the superintendent and board president of each school district and county office of education. This report shall include a description of the number and types of waivers requested of the board, the actions of the board on those requests, and sources of further information on existing or possible waivers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1298, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Purpose [33080. - 33080.]

33080.

Each child is a unique person, with unique needs, and the purpose of the educational system of this state is to enable each child to develop all of his or her own potential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Superintendent of Public Instruction [33100. - 33195.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. Appointment and Salaries [33100. - 33102.]

33100.

A vacancy in the office of Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be filled by appointment by the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33102.

The actual and necessary traveling expenses of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, his deputy and assistants, shall be ordered and paid out of the appropriation made for the Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [33110. - 33133.5.]

33110.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may employ one Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction and necessary clerical and expert assistants, and may fix the compensation of all statutory and other employees as provided by law, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33111.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall execute, under direction of the State Board of Education, the policies which have been decided upon by the board and shall direct, under general rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education, the work of all appointees and employees of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33112.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:

(a) Superintend the schools of this state. 

(b) Prepare, have printed, and furnish to teachers and to all officers charged with the administration of the laws relating to the public schools the blank forms and books necessary to the discharge of their duties, including blank teachers’ certificates to be used by county and city and county boards of education. 

(c) Authenticate with his or her official seal all drafts or orders drawn by him or her, and all papers and writings issued from his or her office. 

(d) Have bound, at the state bindery, all valuable school reports, journals, and documents in his or her office, or received by him or her. 

(e) Deliver over, at the expiration of his or her term of office, on demand, to his or her successor, all property, books, documents, maps, records, reports, and other papers belonging to his or her office, or which may have been received by him or her for the use of his or her office. 

(f) Designate and appoint, or terminate the designation and appointment of, any officer or employee of the department to have the powers and liabilities of a deputy, including designation pursuant to Section 7.9 of the Government Code, which appointment and termination of appointment shall be effective when filed in writing in the office of the Secretary of State. 

(g) Annually inform the governing boards of school districts, in a manner prescribed by the superintendent, of the provisions of Section 60510.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1028, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

33113.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prescribe regulations under which contracts, agreements, or arrangements may be made with agencies of the federal government for funds, services, commodities, or equipment to be made available to schools under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 186.)
-------------------------------------------

33113.5.

(a) The department may require employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The department shall electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 22.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

33114.

All such contracts, agreements or arrangements shall be entered into in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and in no other manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33115.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may enter into an agreement with the government of the United States or any agency thereof relative to the establishment of courses of study in aeronautics in the technical schools of the public school system, except the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

33116.

The Director of Education may enter into agreements with any agency of the federal government for the education of persons in the service of the federal government in schools under the jurisdiction of the Department of Education. All money received from an agency of the federal government for the education of persons in any such school is hereby appropriated for the support of such school in addition to such other funds as may be appropriated therefor by the Legislature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33117.

The Director of Education may enter into agreements with agencies of the federal government, county superintendents of schools, county boards of education, any school district, and state college foundations or other auxiliary organizations, including those established pursuant to Section 90000 for the performance of any services for those agencies by any school under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Education. All money received under any agreement, except recovery of contributions to the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund, is hereby appropriated for the support of the school in addition to other funds as may be appropriated therefor by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

33117.5.

(a) Adult education programs and regional occupational programs operated by school districts and county offices of education that have contracted with the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subdivision (b) shall provide services to welfare recipients referred by county welfare departments in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 11322.8 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11325.22 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. These services shall include an evaluation of the individual’s educational and training needs for purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 11322.8 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11325.22 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the preparation of a related education and training plan reflecting these needs. The plan shall specify the educational and training services to be provided and the length of time services are to be provided, and shall assure access to those services.
